Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB450.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "games of chance," "passive selection device" and "tavern games" in section 103 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, are amended and the section is 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall, except as provided under section 902, have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Electronic pull-tab." An electronic facsimile of a paper pull-tab that is played on an electronic pull-tab device and purchased from a licensed distributor."Electronic pull-tab device." A hand-held portable electronic passive device, including, but not limited to, a cell phone or tablet, owned by the individual playing an electronic pull-tab game and to which the following apply:(1) The device must access an electronic pull-tab software application from the licensee that can only be played on-site at the licensee's location through a router or similar computer hardware that links the device so that electronic pull-tabs can be viewed and played.(2) The device allows for payment via a player's personal bank account through an automated clearing house electronic funds-transfer system , but does not allow the use of coins, currency or tokens to activate credits.(3) The device requires a player to activate or open each electronic pull-tab ticket.(4) The device does not determine the outcome of an electronic pull-tab game, but is merely a device used to view electronic pull-tabs that are provided randomly to the player the same as a paper pull-tab, except in an electronic format.(5) The device maintains credit play accumulated that 20250SB0450PN0930 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be applied to games in play or redeemed through a player's personal bank account through an automated clearing house electronic funds-transfer system upon termination of play.(6) The device may incorporate an amusement feature as part of the game and may award a prize or other benefit for that feature. The device may not require additional consideration.This definition shall not be construed to authorize any other form of gambling currently prohibited under any provision of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or authorized under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).* * *"Games of chance." Punchboards, daily drawings, weekly drawings, 50/50 drawings, raffles, tavern games, pools, race night [games and pull-tabs] games, pull-tabs and electronic pull-tabs, as defined in this act, provided that no such game shall be played by or with the assistance of any mechanical or electrical devices or media other than [a] an electronic pull-tab device, dispensing machine or passive selection device, including an electronic pull-tab, and further provided that the particular chance taken by any person in any such game shall not be made contingent upon any other occurrence or the winning of any other contest, but shall be determined solely at the discretion of the purchaser. This definition shall not be construed to authorize any other form of gambling currently prohibited under any provision of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or authorized under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements). Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize games commonly known as "slot machines" or "video poker" or 20250SB0450PN0930 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other games regulated by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.* * *"Passive selection device." A device which is used to hold or denote the universe of possible winning numbers or entrants in a daily drawing or raffle or for electronic pull-tabs. Such a device may not have the capability of being utilized to conduct or aid in the conducting of unauthorized or illegal forms of gambling.* * *"Tavern games." Pull-tabs, electronic pull-tabs, tavern daily drawings and tavern raffles.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 301.2. Payment.(a) Acceptance.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a licensed eligible organization may accept payment from and distribute proceeds to a player via a player's personal bank account through an automated clearing house electronic funds-transfer system for the playing of games of chance.(b) Exception.--A licensee under Chapter 9 may not accept mobile payment services for the playing of games of chance.Section 3. Sections 302, 303, 304(a) and (g), 305 and 306(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 302. Prize limits.(a) Individual prize [limit].--Except as provided under subsections (d) and (d.1), [the] there is no maximum prize which may be awarded for any single chance [shall be $2,000].(b) Aggregate prize [limit].--[No more than $35,000 in prizes shall be] There is no limit on prizes awarded from games of chance by a licensed eligible organization in any seven-day 20250SB0450PN0930 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period.(c) Raffle prize limit.--Up to $15,000 in prizes may be awarded in raffles in any calendar month.[(c.1) Total limit.--All prizes awarded under this section shall be subject to the aggregate prize limits under subsection (b).](d) Exception for raffles.--Notwithstanding subsection [(b) or] (c), a licensed eligible organization may conduct a raffle under section 308 and award a prize or prizes valued in excess of $3,000 each only under the following conditions:(1) The licensing authority has issued a special permit for the raffle under section 308.(2) A licensed eligible organization shall be eligible to receive no more than ten special permits in any licensed term except that a volunteer fire, ambulance, rescue or conservation organization that is not a club licensee shall be eligible to receive 12 special permits in any licensed term.(3) Only one raffle may be conducted under each special permit issued under section 308.(4) Except as provided under subsection (d.1), the total of all prizes awarded under this subsection shall be no more than $150,000 per calendar year, which shall not be subject to the aggregate limit under subsection (b) or (c).(5) The prize limit of any individual raffle ticket shall be 500 times the amount of the purchase price of the ticket, with the maximum prize not to exceed $5,000.(d.1) Additional award.--A volunteer fire, ambulance, rescue or conservation organization may, in addition to the total under subsection (d)(4), award up to $100,000 from raffles which shall 20250SB0450PN0930 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be subject to the aggregate limit under subsection (b), (c) or (d).(f) Daily drawing carryover.--[The prize limitation contained in subsections (a) and (b) may be exceeded by a daily drawing under the following circumstances: a] A daily drawing may award a prize in excess of $2,000 if such prize is the result of a carryover of a drawing which resulted from the winning number in such drawing not being among the eligible entrants in such drawings. Nothing contained herein shall authorize the prize limitation as contained in [subsections (a) and (b)] subsection (c) to be exceeded as a result of a failure to conduct a drawing on an operating day during which chances were sold for a daily drawing or for a daily drawing for which chances were sold in excess of $1 or for which more than one chance was sold to an eligible participant.(g) Additional exception.--When a daily drawing or weekly drawing is set up or conducted in such a manner as to pay out or award 100% of the gross revenues generated from such drawing, the limitation contained in subsection [(b)] (c) shall not apply.(h) Weekly drawing carryover exception.--Weekly drawings shall be governed by the prize limitation contained in subsection [(b)] (c). The prize limitation contained in subsection [(b)] (c) may be exceeded by a weekly drawing under the following circumstances: a weekly drawing may award a prize where the cash value is in excess of $35,000 if such prize is the result of a carryover of a drawing or drawings which resulted from the winning number or numbers in such drawing or drawings not being among the eligible entrants in such drawings. Nothing contained in this chapter shall authorize the prize 20250SB0450PN0930 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limitation under subsection [(b)] (c) to be exceeded as a result of a failure to conduct a drawing for a week during which chances were sold for a weekly drawing or for a weekly drawing for which chances were sold in excess of $1.(i) Concurrent operation.--Nothing under this act shall prohibit the concurrent operation of daily or weekly drawings.Section 303. Sales limited.[(a) General rule.--]No person shall sell, offer for sale or furnish games of chance for use within this Commonwealth except to an eligible organization or licensed distributor under this chapter.[(b) Limitation.--No game of chance, other than a raffle under section 302(d), sold, offered for sale or furnished to a licensed eligible organization for use within this Commonwealth shall contain, permit, depict or designate a prize having a prize limit in excess of $2,000.]Section 304. Distributor licenses.(a) License required.--No person shall sell, offer for sale or furnish games of chance to eligible organizations licensed under this chapter or licensed under Chapter 9 unless such person shall have obtained a distributor license as provided in this section. A registered manufacturer may obtain a distributor license.* * *(g) Ineligibility.--The department shall not issue or renew a distributor license for the sale of games of chance to a person, including any corporation, [firm or partnership] firm, partnership or entity which has as an officer, director, shareholder, person related by blood or through marriage or other person in a supervisory or management position, or 20250SB0450PN0930 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employee [eligible to make sales on behalf of the distributor], who:(1) has been convicted of a felony in a state or Federal court within the past [five] ten years; or(2) has been convicted within ten years of the date of application in a state or Federal court of a violation of any of the following:(i) This act.(ii) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(iii) A gambling-related offense under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).(iv) A gambling-related offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(v) A Federal or State law comparable to the statutes listed under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv).* * *Section 305. Registration of manufacturers.(a) Registration required.--No manufacturer of games of chance shall sell any games of chance to any person, eligible organization or tavern unless the manufacturer has registered with the department and has been issued a certificate of registration. A registered manufacturer may apply to be a licensed distributor.(b) Annual certificate; fee.--A certificate under this section shall be valid for one year. The annual fee for registration shall be $2,000.(c) Prohibited sales.--A manufacturer shall not sell games of chance to any person not licensed as a distributor unless the 20250SB0450PN0930 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturer is also a licensed distributor.(c.1) Requirements for software.--Software supplied by a manufacturer of electronic pull-tabs must meet the following requirements:(1) Software used in a passive selection device must be owned by the manufacturer, including the designs of the central system, database, program architecture and source code used in the passive selection device. A manufacturer shall not license from or pay any other person, corporation, entity, firm or partnership an ongoing or continuing fee of any kind for the software used in a passive selection device.(2) Software to be used must first be tested and certified, at the cost of the manufacturer, by an authorized third-party testing laboratory approved by the department.(c.2) Ineligibility.--The department shall not issue or renew a manufacturer certificate of registration for the manufacture of games of chance, including software for electronic pull-tabs, to a person, including any corporation, firm, partnership or any entity which has as an officer, director, shareholder, person related by blood or through marriage or other person in a supervisory or management position, or employee of the manufacturer, who:(1) has been convicted of a felony in any state or Federal court within the past ten years; or(2) has been convicted within ten years of the date of application in a state or Federal court of a violation of any of the following:(i) This act.(ii) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.20250SB0450PN0930 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A gambling-related offense under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).(iv) A gambling-related offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(v) A Federal or State law comparable to the statutes listed under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv).(d) Exception.--This section shall not apply to the manufacture or distribution of raffle tickets, 50/50 drawings, daily drawings, weekly drawings or pools.Section 306. Regulations of department.(a) Authorization.--The department shall promulgate regulations to:(1) Impose minimum standards and restrictions applicable to games of chance manufactured for sale in this Commonwealth, which may include standards and restrictions which specify the maximum number of chances available to be sold for any single game of chance [or prize] and such other standards and restrictions as the department deems necessary for the purposes of this chapter. The department shall consider standards adopted by the National Association of Gambling Regulatory Agencies and other standards commonly accepted in the industry.(2) Establish procedures by which manufacturers may register and distributors of games of chance may apply for licensure on forms which the department shall provide. Procedures shall include a requirement that manufacturer and distributor applicants provide criminal history record information obtained from the Pennsylvania State Police under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b) (relating to general regulations) for 20250SB0450PN0930 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each [officer and manager] officer, manager and shareholder of the manufacturer's or distributor's organization, including any relative related by blood or through marriage thereof, and for any other individual specified by the department. As used in this paragraph, the term "criminal history record information" has the meaning given in 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions).(3) Provide for the suspension or revocation of distribution licenses or manufacturer certificates for violations of this act or regulations of the department.(3.1) Establish procedures to ensure that race night games are secure, random and totally dependent upon chance.(3.2) Require distributors and manufacturers of electronic pull-tabs to have the electronic pull-tab device and software tested under the standards used by a laboratory approved by the department.(4) Carry out other provisions of this act.* * *Section 4. Section 501(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 501. Club licensee.(a) Report.--* * *(4) If a licensee offers the use of electronic pull-tabs:(i) the licensed distributor of the electronic pull-tab device or software shall:(A) provide the department with the financial reporting information generated by the manufacturer's software required under this chapter; and20250SB0450PN0930 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) be responsible for any penalties for failure to provide the accurate financial reporting information generated by the manufacturer's software to both the Commonwealth and the licensee.(ii) the licensee utilizing the electronic pull-tab device or software shall:(A) use the manufacturer's reporting information for any reporting required by the Commonwealth;(B) be responsible for supplying the Commonwealth with all required reports; and(C) be responsible for any penalties for failure to provide the Commonwealth with required reports.* * *Section 5. Sections 502(a), 701(a)(9)(ii) and 703(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 502. Distribution of proceeds.(a) Distribution.--The proceeds from games of chance received by a club licensee shall be distributed as follows:(1) No less than [60%] 35% of the proceeds shall be paid for public interest purposes within one year of the end of the calendar year in which the proceeds were obtained.(2) No more than [40%] 65% of the proceeds obtained in a calendar year may be retained by a club licensee.* * *Section 701. Revocation of licenses.(a) Grounds.--The following shall be grounds for suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of a license:* * *(9) The eligible organization conducts the games of chance under a lease which calls for:20250SB0450PN0930 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(ii) leasing such premises from the owner thereof under a written agreement at a rental which is determined by the [amount] number of receipts realized from the playing of games of chance.* * *Section 703. Local option.(a) Election to be held.--In any municipality, an election may be held on the date of the primary election immediately preceding any municipal election, but not more than once in four years, to determine the will of the electors with respect to the issuance of club licenses within the limits of such municipality under the provisions of this act. Where an election shall have been held at the primary election preceding a municipal election in any year, another election may be held under the provisions of this act at the primary election occurring the fourth year after such prior election. Whenever electors equal to at least 25% of the highest vote cast for any office in the municipality at the last preceding general election shall file a petition with the county board of elections of the county, or the governing body of the municipality adopts, by a majority vote, a resolution to place such a question on the ballot and a copy of the resolution is filed with the board of elections of the county, for a referendum on the question of issuing licenses, the county board of elections shall cause a question to be placed on the ballot or on the voting machine board and submitted at the primary election immediately preceding the municipal election. The question shall be in the following form:Do you favor the issuance of licensesto conduct small games of chance in the20250SB0450PN0930 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of ?* * *Section 6. Section 704 of the act is repealed:[Section 704. Advertising.It shall be unlawful for any eligible organization or person to advertise the prizes or their dollar value to be awarded in games of chance, provided that prizes may be identified on raffle tickets. Notwithstanding the prohibition of advertising contained within this section, an eligible organization may advertise prizes and values thereof in periodic publications which are limited in their circulation to members of the eligible organization.]Section 7. Sections 903(h), 904, 905(c), 907, 909, 909.1(a), 911, 912 and 913(c) and (d) of the act are amended to read:Section 903. Licenses.* * *(h) Costs.--The applicant shall reimburse the bureau up to $250 for the actual costs of conducting the background investigation. The board shall not approve an applicant that has not fully reimbursed the bureau, up to $250, for the investigation.* * *Section 904. Application.(a) Application fee.--An applicant shall pay the board a nonrefundable application fee of [$1,000] $250.(b) Investigative fee.--An applicant shall pay an investigative fee of [$1,000] no more than $250 to the bureau.(c) Costs.--[In addition to the fee under subsection (b), an applicant and any owner and officer of the applicant shall pay for the actual costs of a background investigation conducted by 20250SB0450PN0930 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the bureau that exceed the application fee.] The bureau may:(1) Charge an estimated amount to be provided prior to the background investigation, which shall not exceed $250.(2) Submit for reimbursement from the applicant for the additional costs incurred in the background investigation, provided the total cost for the background investigation for the applicant does not exceed $250.(d) Funds.--Funds collected under subsections (b) and (c) shall augment the funds appropriated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).Section 905. Approval.* * *(c) Fee.--Upon approval, the applicant shall pay a [$2,000] $250 license fee to be deposited in the General Fund. The annual renewal fee shall be [$1,000] $2,000.* * *Section 907. Prize limits.(a) Individual prize limit.--[The maximum] There shall be no maximum prize which may be awarded for any single chance [shall be $2,000. No tavern game sold, offered for sale or furnished may contain, permit, depict or designate a prize having a prize limit in excess of $2,000].(b) Aggregate prize limit.--[No more than $35,000 in prizes] There shall be no prize limit for prizes that may be awarded from tavern games by a licensee [in a seven-day period].Section 909. Distribution of net revenue.Beginning January 1, 2014, the net revenue from tavern games received by a licensee shall be distributed as follows:(1) [Sixty] Thirty-five percent of the net revenue obtained in any calendar year shall be paid to the 20250SB0450PN0930 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(2) [Thirty-five] Sixty-five percent of the net revenue obtained in any calendar year may be retained by the licensee.(3) Five percent shall be paid to the Commonwealth and deposited into the restricted receipts account established in section 909.3.Section 909.1. Tavern games tax.(a) Imposition.--There is imposed a tax of [60%] 35% of the net revenue from tavern games sold by a licensed distributor to a licensee within this Commonwealth.* * *Section 911. Invoice.A sale of a tavern game by a licensed distributor or registered manufacturer to a licensee must be documented by an invoice listing the names and types of games sold, quantities of each game sold, the net revenue of each game and the aggregate amount of tax due on the net revenue on each invoice. Failure to provide a correct invoice shall result in a penalty of 50% of the tax amount due payable to the Commonwealth.Section 912. Reports.(a) Report required.--A licensee shall submit an annual report to the board and the department for the preceding year on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. The department shall develop a schedule for the submission of the annual report. The report shall include:(1) Prizes awarded as required under section 335 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) Net revenue received from each tavern game 20250SB0450PN0930 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conducted, itemized by week.(3) Amount of prizes paid from all tavern games, itemized by week.(4) Amount of tax remitted to the department.(5) Amount given to designated charities from tavern raffles.(6) Other information as required by the department.(b) Electronic pull-tabs.--For a licensee using electronic pull-tabs, the licensed distributor of the electronic pull-tabs shall be responsible for submitting the report regarding the electronic pull-tabs under subsection (a). A licensed distributor that fails to submit the report shall be liable to any applicable penalty under section 913.Section 913. Enforcement.* * *(c) Penalties.--The board may impose a civil penalty, including against a licensed distributor that provides electronic pull-tabs to a licensee, for a violation of this chapter in accordance with the following:(1) Up to $2,000 for an initial violation.(2) Up to $3,000 for a second violation.(3) Up to $5,000 for a third violation.(d) Criminal penalty.--A violation of this chapter, including by a licensed distributor that provides electronic pull-tabs to a licensee, shall be a misdemeanor of the third degree. A second or subsequent offense shall be a misdemeanor of the second degree.* * *Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0450PN0930 - 17 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829